src/fst/affixes/determiners.lexc
!! # Determiner inflection
! ----------------------
!! This file documents `affixes/determiners.lexc`, the language model for
!! Livonian determiner inflection.


!! ## Stem lexica
!LEXICON DET_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
!+Det:	NMN_PADĀ	;

!LEXICON DET_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
!+Det:	NMN_KĒRA	;

!LEXICON DET_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
!+Det:	NMN_OKŠ	;


!LEXICON DET_VAʼG !!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
!+Det:	NMN_VAʼG	;

!LEXICON DET_KUʼŽ !!= @CODE@ kuʼž:kuž 89
!+Det:	NMN_KUʼŽ	;

!LEXICON DET_RUZŪ !!= @CODE@ : 90
!+Det:	NMN_RUZŪ	;

!!= @CODE@ : 118
!LEXICON DET_SIELDÕ
!+Det:	NMN_SIELDÕ	;

!LEXICON DET_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
!+Det:	NMN_NǬʼGÕ	;

!LEXICON DET_IRM !!= @CODE@ irm: 125
!+Det:	NMN_IRM	;

!LEXICON DET_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126 kim:kim
!+Det:	NMN_KIM	;


!LEXICON DET_FAKT !!= @CODE@ fakt: 135
!+Det:	NMN_FAKT	;

!LEXICON DET_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ āigast: 140
!+Det:	NMN_ĀIGAST	;

LEXICON DET_VĪDÕZ !!= @CODE@ vīdõz: 163
+Det:	NMN_VĪDÕZ	;

LEXICON DET_TUOISTÕNZ !!= @CODE@ : 164
+Det:	NMN_TUOISTÕNZ	;

LEXICON DET_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ !!= @CODE@ ī'dõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
+Det:	NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ	;


LEXICON DET_NAI !!= @CODE@ nai: 191
+Det:	NMN_NAI	;

LEXICON DET_TŪĻI !!= @CODE@ tūļi: 199
+Det:	NMN_TŪĻI	;

LEXICON DET_SĒMI !!= @CODE@ sēmi: 201
+Det:	NMN_SĒMI	;


!LEXICON DET_ÄʼBȚÕKS !!= @CODE@ ä'bțõks:äbțõks 208
!+Det:	NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS	;

!LEXICON DET_TŪĻ !!= @CODE@ : 214
!+Det:	NMN_TŪĻ	;

!LEXICON DET_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
!+Det:	NMN_PŪOL	;

!LEXICON DET_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
!+Det:	NMN_ĪKŠ	;

!LEXICON DET_KAKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 218
!+Det:	NMN_KAKŠ	;

!LEXICON DET_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
!+Det:	NMN_ŪŽ	;

!LEXICON DET_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
!+Det:	NMN_APPÕN	;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
